apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="dr/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agit</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agen</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aget</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agna</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fäst/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/innas__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>innas</l>      <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></e>
  <e>       <p><l>finns</l>      <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anns</l>       <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unnits</l>     <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="göm/ma__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ma</l>        <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>          <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>     <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>       <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>ma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="erkän/na__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ner</l>       <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>          <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nande</l>     <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>       <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>       <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>na<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="skäm/mas__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>mas</l>        <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ms</l>       <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>          <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>       <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="min/nas__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>        <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>       <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>          <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>       <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>         <r>mas<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="gl/ädja__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ädja</l>         <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ädjer</l>        <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>äder</l>        <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äds</l>        <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ädjes</l>         <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adde</l>        <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>         <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äd</l>          <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ädjande</l>      <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>add</l>         <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>         <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adda</l>        <r>ädja<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sk/juta__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>juta</l>       <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>juter</l>      <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>juts</l>       <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öt</l>        <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jutit</l>      <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jut</l>        <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jutande</l>    <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>juten</l>      <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jutet</l>      <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jutna</l>      <r>juta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!--NEW -->

<e lm="gömma"><i>göm</i><par n="göm/ma__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fästa"><i>fäst</i><par n="fäst/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återfinnas"><i>återf</i><par n="f/innas__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="glömma"><i>glöm</i><par n="göm/ma__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="glädja"><i>gl</i><par n="gl/ädja__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="berömma"><i>beröm</i><par n="göm/ma__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bidra"><i>bidr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lyfta"><i>lyft</i><par n="fäst/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="påminna"><i>påmin</i><par n="erkän/na__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="minnas"><i>min</i><par n="min/nas__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överensstämma"><i>överensstäm</i><par n="göm/ma__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="instämma"><i>instäm</i><par n="göm/ma__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skämmas"><i>skäm</i><par n="skäm/mas__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skjuta"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/juta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="befästa"><i>befäst</i><par n="fäst/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="föredra"><i>föredr</i><par n="dr/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="erkänna"><i>erkän</i><par n="erkän/na__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestämma"><i>bestäm</i><par n="göm/ma__vblex"/></e>
